Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
CHAPTER 18 Registry for Traumatic Brain and Spinal Cord Injuries

Cross references.

Brain and Spinal Injury Trust Fund, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. IX, Para. VI(k).

Administrative rules and regulations.

Traumatic brain injury facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Health, Healthcare Facility Regulation, Subject 111-8-71.

31-18-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to create a state-wide central registry for traumatic brain and spinal cord injuries to ensure the registration of all persons with traumatic brain or spinal cord injuries in order that all such persons might obtain information about rehabilitative, independent living, and other services or goods provided by existing state agencies, departments, other organizations, and individuals.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3401, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1245, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 871, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 31; Ga. L. 2006, p. 175, § 1/SB 208.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2006, “central registry for traumatic brain and spinal cord injuries” was substituted for “Central Registry for Traumatic Brain and Spinal Injuries”.

31-18-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Brain injury” means a traumatic injury to the brain (cranio-cerebral head trauma), not of a degenerative or congenital nature, but arising from blunt or penetrating trauma or from acceleration-deceleration forces, that is associated with any of these symptoms or signs attributed to the injury: decreased level of consciousness, amnesia, other neurologic or neuropsychologic abnormalities, skull fracture, or diagnosed intracranial lesions. These impairments may be either temporary or permanent and can result in a partial or total functional disability.

“Spinal cord injury” means a traumatic injury to the spinal cord, not of a degenerative or congenital nature, but arising from blunt or penetrating trauma or from acceleration-deceleration forces, resulting in paraplegia or quadriplegia, which can be a partial or total loss of physical function.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3402, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1245, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 871, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 175, § 1/SB 208.

31-18-3.
Reporting procedures.

Every public and private health and social agency, every hospital or facility that has a valid permit or provisional permit issued by the Department of Community Health under Chapter 7 of this title, and every physician licensed to practice medicine in this state, if such physician has not otherwise reported such information to another agency, hospital, and facility, shall report to the Brain and Spinal Injury Trust Fund Commission such information concerning the identity of the person such agency, hospital, facility, or physician has identified as having a traumatic brain or spinal cord injury as defined in this chapter. The report shall be made within 45 days after identification of the person with the traumatic brain or spinal cord injury. The report shall contain the name, age, address, type and extent of injury, and such other information concerning the person with the injury as the Brain and Spinal Injury Trust Fund Commission, which is administratively assigned to the department, may require.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3403, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1245, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1027, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 871, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 1107, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 175, § 1/SB 208; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-29/SB 433.

31-18-4.
Duties of commission.

The Brain and Spinal Injury Trust Fund Commission, which is administratively assigned to the Department of Public Health, shall establish procedures whereby a person with a traumatic brain or spinal cord injury for whom a report is made pursuant to this chapter shall be informed of appropriate agencies, departments, hospitals, facilities, organizations, or individuals providing rehabilitative, independent living, and other services or goods.

The Brain and Spinal Injury Trust Fund Commission shall maintain records of reports and notifications made under this chapter. The Brain and Spinal Injury Trust Fund Commission shall produce an annual report relating to information and data collected pursuant to this chapter and shall make such report available upon request. Such report shall be submitted annually no later than October 1 to the Office of Health Strategy and Coordination.

Statistical information collected under this chapter shall be available to any other federal or state agency or private organization concerned with traumatic brain or spinal cord injuries, but no names or addresses will be provided without the consent of the person with the traumatic brain or spinal cord injury or the consent of the immediate family or guardian of such person if that person is unable to consent.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3404, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1245, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1027, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 833, § 2; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1985, p. 871, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1137, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 1107, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 175, § 1/SB 208; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 31/SB 46; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-3/HB 214; Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-13/HB 186.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added the third sentence in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2019, p. 148, § 2-1/HB 186, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This part shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Health Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).